Maryland, session 2025, SB0600.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (1) (i) A citation issued pursuant to § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.1,
§ 21–707.2, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation
Article shall provide that the person receiving the citation may elect to stand trial by
notifying the issuing agency of the person’s intention to stand trial at least 5 days prior to
the date of payment as set forth in the citation.
(3) [Civil] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, CIVIL penalties resulting from citations issued using a vehicle height
monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring system,
work zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring
camera, bus lane monitoring system, or noise abatement monitoring system that are
– 2 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
collected by the District Court shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this
section and distributed in accordance with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
(4) (i) Except as provided in [paragraph (5)] PARAGRAPHS (5) AND
(6) of this subsection, from the fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of
violations enforced by speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop
sign monitoring systems, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or
noise abatement monitoring systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, school bus monitoring
cameras, or bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(6) FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
DISTRICT COURT AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY A STOP SIGN
MONITORING SYSTEM, 50% SHALL BE:
(I) DISTRIBUTED TO THE LOCAL MANAGEMENT BOARD FOR
BALTIMORE CITY; AND
(II) USED ONLY FOR PROVIDING YOUTH PROGRAMMING AND
SERVICES FOR YOUTH LIVING IN OR ATTENDING A SCHOOL LOCATED IN THE 45TH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
10–311.
(g) A recorded image of a motor vehicle produced by a stop sign monitoring system
in accordance with § 21–707.1 OR § 21–707.2 of the Transportation Article is admissible
in a proceeding concerning a civil citation issued under that section for a violation of §
21–707 of the Transportation Article without authentication.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (1) (i) A citation issued pursuant to § 21–202.1, § 21–706.1, § 21–707.2,
§ 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, or § 24–111.3 of the Transportation Article shall provide
that the person receiving the citation may elect to stand trial by notifying the issuing
– 3 –

Ch. 571 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
agency of the person’s intention to stand trial at least 5 days prior to the date of payment
as set forth in the citation.
(ii) On receipt of the notice to stand trial, the agency shall forward
to the District Court having venue a copy of the citation and a copy of the notice from the
person who received the citation indicating the person’s intention to stand trial.
(iii) On receipt thereof, the District Court shall schedule the case for
trial and notify the defendant of the trial date under procedures adopted by the Chief Judge
of the District Court.
(2) (i) A citation issued as the result of a vehicle height monitoring
system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a speed monitoring system, a work zone
speed control system OR A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM controlled by a political
subdivision, a school bus monitoring camera, or a bus lane monitoring system shall provide
that, in an uncontested case, the penalty shall be paid directly to that political subdivision.
(ii) A citation issued as the result of a traffic control signal
monitoring system or a work zone speed control system controlled by a State agency, or as
a result of a vehicle height monitoring system, a traffic control signal monitoring system, a
speed monitoring system, A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM, a school bus monitoring
camera, or a bus lane monitoring system in a case contested in District Court, shall provide
that the penalty shall be paid directly to the District Court.
(3) Civil EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, CIVIL penalties resulting from citations issued using a vehicle height
monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring system,
work zone speed control system, STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM, school bus monitoring
camera, or bus lane monitoring system that are collected by the District Court shall be
collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and distributed in accordance
with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
(4) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (5) PARAGRAPHS (5) AND (6)
of this subsection, from the fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations
enforced by speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, STOP SIGN
MONITORING SYSTEMS, school bus monitoring cameras, or bus lane monitoring systems,
a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, STOP SIGN MONITORING
SYSTEMS, school bus monitoring cameras, or bus lane monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, may spend
any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including pedestrian or highway
safety programs.
– 4 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
(ii) 1. For any fiscal year, if the balance remaining from the fines
collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations enforced by speed monitoring
systems, after the costs of implementing and administering the systems are recovered in
accordance with subparagraph (i)1 of this paragraph, is greater than 10% of the total
revenues of the political subdivision for the fiscal year, the political subdivision shall remit
any funds that exceed 10% of the total revenues to the Comptroller.
2. The Comptroller shall deposit any money remitted under
this subparagraph to the General Fund of the State.
(6) FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
DISTRICT COURT AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY A STOP SIGN
MONITORING SYSTEM, 50% SHALL BE:
(I) DISTRIBUTED TO THE LOCAL MANAGEMENT BOARD FOR
BALTIMORE CITY; AND
(II) USED ONLY FOR PROVIDING YOUTH PROGRAMMING AND
SERVICES FOR YOUTH LIVING IN OR ATTENDING A SCHOOL LOCATED IN THE 45TH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
10–311.
(F) A RECORDED IMAGE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE PRODUCED BY A STOP SIGN
MONITORING SYSTEM IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 21–707.2 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE IS ADMISSIBLE IN A PROCEEDING CONCERNING A CIVIL CITATION ISSUED
UNDER THAT SECTION FOR A VIOLATION OF § 21–707.2 OF THE TRANSPORTATION
ARTICLE WITHOUT AUTHENTICATION.
[(f)] (G) In any other judicial proceeding, a recorded image produced by a vehicle
height monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring
system, work zone speed control system, STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM, school bus
monitoring camera, or bus lane monitoring system is admissible as otherwise provided by
law.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the Laws of Maryland read
as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
4–401.
Except as provided in § 4–402 of this subtitle, and subject to the venue provisions of
Title 6 of this article, the District Court has exclusive original civil jurisdiction in:
– 5 –

Ch. 571 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(13) A proceeding for a civil infraction under § 21–202.1, § 21–704.1, §
21–706.1, § 21–707.1, § 21–707.2, § 21–809, § 21–810, § 21–1134, § 22–612, or § 24–111.3
of the Transportation Article or § 10–112 of the Criminal Law Article;
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
7–302.
(e) (4) (3) [Civil] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (6) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, CIVIL penalties resulting from citations issued using a vehicle height
monitoring system, traffic control signal monitoring system, speed monitoring system, work
zone speed control system, stop sign monitoring system, school bus monitoring camera, bus
lane monitoring system, or a noise abatement monitoring system that are collected by the
District Court shall be collected in accordance with subsection (a) of this section and
distributed in accordance with § 12–118 of the Transportation Article.
(4) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (5) PARAGRAPHS (5) AND (6)
of this subsection, from the fines collected by a political subdivision as a result of violations
enforced by speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, stop sign monitoring
systems, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement
monitoring systems, a political subdivision:
1. May recover the costs of implementing and administering
the speed monitoring systems, work zone speed control systems, STOP SIGN MONITORING
SYSTEMS, school bus monitoring cameras, bus lane monitoring systems, or noise abatement
monitoring systems; and
2. Subject to subparagraphs (ii), (iii), and (iv) of this
paragraph, may spend any remaining balance solely for public safety purposes, including
pedestrian or highway safety programs.
(6) FROM THE FINES COLLECTED BY BALTIMORE CITY OR THE
DISTRICT COURT AS A RESULT OF VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY A STOP SIGN
MONITORING SYSTEM LOCATED IN BALTIMORE CITY, 50% SHALL BE:
(I) DISTRIBUTED TO THE LOCAL MANAGEMENT BOARD FOR
BALTIMORE CITY; AND
(II) 1. FROM THE FINES COLLECTED AS A RESULT OF
VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM LOCATED IN THE 45TH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT, USED ONLY FOR PROVIDING YOUTH PROGRAMMING AND
SERVICES FOR YOUTH LIVING IN OR ATTENDING A SCHOOL LOCATED IN THE 45TH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT; OR
– 6 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
2. FROM THE FINES COLLECTED AS A RESULT OF
VIOLATIONS ENFORCED BY A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM LOCATED IN THE 46TH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT, USED ONLY FOR PROVIDING YOUTH PROGRAMMING AND
SERVICES FOR YOUTH LIVING IN OR ATTENDING A SCHOOL LOCATED IN THE 46TH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT.
Article – Transportation
21–707.
(a) Unless otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control signal, the driver
of a vehicle approaching a stop sign at an intersection shall stop at the near side of the
intersection at a clearly marked stop line.
(b) Unless otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control signal, the driver
of a vehicle approaching a stop sign at an intersection shall stop at the near side of the
intersection and, if there is no clearly marked stop line, before entering any crosswalk.
(c) Unless otherwise directed by a police officer or traffic control signal, the driver
of a vehicle approaching a stop sign at an intersection shall stop at the near side of an
intersection and, if there is no crosswalk, at the nearest point before entering the
intersection that gives the driver a view of traffic approaching on the intersecting roadway.
(d) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign at an intersection, if required
for safety to stop, shall stop at the near side of the intersection at a clearly marked stop
line.
(e) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign at an intersection, if required
for safety to stop, shall stop at the near side of the intersection and, if there is no clearly
marked stop line, before entering any crosswalk.
(f) The driver of a vehicle approaching a yield sign at an intersection, if required
for safety to stop, shall stop at the near side of the intersection and, if there is no crosswalk,
at the nearest point before entering the intersection that gives the driver a view of traffic
approaching on the intersecting roadway.
21–707.2.
(A) THIS SECTION APPLIES ONLY IN BALTIMORE CITY.
(B) (1) IN THIS SECTION THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
– 7 –

Ch. 571 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) “AGENCY” MEANS A LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY THAT IS
AUTHORIZED TO ISSUE A CITATION FOR A VIOLATION OF THE MARYLAND VEHICLE
LAW OR OF LOCAL TRAFFIC LAWS OR REGULATIONS.
(3) (I) “OWNER” MEANS THE REGISTERED OWNER OF A MOTOR
VEHICLE OR LESSEE OF A MOTOR VEHICLE UNDER A LEASE OF 6 MONTHS OR MORE.
(II) “OWNER” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
1. A MOTOR VEHICLE LEASING COMPANY; OR
2. A HOLDER OF A SPECIAL REGISTRATION PLATE
ISSUED UNDER TITLE 13, SUBTITLE 9, PART III OF THIS ARTICLE.
(4) “RECORDED IMAGE” MEANS IMAGES RECORDED BY A STOP SIGN
MONITORING SYSTEM:
(I) ON:
1. TWO OR MORE PHOTOGRAPHS;
2. TWO OR MORE MICROPHOTOGRAPHS;
3. TWO OR MORE ELECTRONIC IMAGES;
4. VIDEOTAPE; OR
5. ANY OTHER MEDIUM; AND
(II) SHOWING A MOTOR VEHICLE AND, ON AT LEAST ONE IMAGE
OR PORTION OF TAPE, CLEARLY IDENTIFYING THE REGISTRATION PLATE NUMBER
OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(5) “STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM” MEANS A DEVICE DESIGNED
TO CAPTURE A RECORDED IMAGE OF A VIOLATION.
(6) (I) “VIOLATION” MEANS A FAILURE TO COME TO A COMPLETE
STOP AT A STOP SIGN IN VIOLATION OF § 21–707 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(II) “VIOLATION” DOES NOT INCLUDE ANY ACTION A DRIVER IS
INSTRUCTED TO TAKE BY A POLICE OFFICER.
(C) (1) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (4) OF THIS
SUBSECTION, AN AGENCY MAY USE STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEMS:
– 8 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
(I) ON HIGHWAYS LOCATED IN A SCHOOL ZONE IN THE 45TH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT AND MAINTAINED BY BALTIMORE CITY, IF AUTHORIZED BY
THE CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE CITY; OR
(II) ON STATE HIGHWAYS LOCATED IN A SCHOOL ZONE IN THE
45TH LEGISLATIVE DISTRICT, IF AUTHORIZED BY THE STATE HIGHWAY
ADMINISTRATION.
(2) A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM MAY NOT BE USED UNDER THIS
SECTION UNLESS ITS USE IS AUTHORIZED BY THE CITY COUNCIL OF BALTIMORE
CITY BY LOCAL LAW ENACTED AFTER REASONABLE NOTICE AND A PUBLIC HEARING.
(3) BEFORE BEGINNING USE OF STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEMS,
AN AGENCY SHALL PUBLISH NOTICE THAT THE AGENCY HAS ADOPTED THE USE OF
STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEMS ON ITS WEBSITE AND IN A NEWSPAPER OF
GENERAL CIRCULATION IN BALTIMORE CITY.
(4) (I) THE CITY SHALL PROMINENTLY PLACE SIGNS ON
HIGHWAYS WITHIN THE CITY PROVIDING NOTICE THAT STOP SIGN MONITORING
SYSTEMS ARE USED IN THE CITY.
(II) THE STATE HIGHWAY ADMINISTRATION SHALL PLACE
SIGNS PROMINENTLY PROVIDING NOTICE THAT STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEMS
ARE IN USE ON STATE HIGHWAYS.
(D) A RECORDED IMAGE UNDER THIS SECTION INDICATING THAT THE
DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE HAS COMMITTED A VIOLATION SHALL INCLUDE:
(1) THE TIME AND DATE OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(2) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE LOCATION OF THE VIOLATION.
(E) (1) UNLESS THE DRIVER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE RECEIVED A
CITATION FROM A POLICE OFFICER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER
OR, IN ACCORDANCE WITH SUBSECTION (F)(3) OR (H)(4) OR (5) OF THIS SECTION,
THE DRIVER OF A MOTOR VEHICLE IS SUBJECT TO A CIVIL PENALTY IF THE MOTOR
VEHICLE IS RECORDED BY A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM DURING THE
COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION.
(2) A CIVIL PENALTY UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT EXCEED $40.
(3) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL
PRESCRIBE:
– 9 –

Ch. 571 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(I) A UNIFORM CITATION FORM CONSISTENT WITH
SUBSECTION (F)(1) OF THIS SECTION AND § 7–302 OF THE COURTS ARTICLE; AND
(II) A CIVIL PENALTY, WHICH SHALL BE INDICATED ON THE
CITATION, TO BE PAID BY PERSONS WHO CHOOSE TO PREPAY THE CIVIL PENALTY
WITHOUT APPEARING IN DISTRICT COURT.
(F) (1) SUBJECT TO THE PROVISIONS OF PARAGRAPHS (2) THROUGH (5)
OF THIS SUBSECTION, AN AGENCY SHALL MAIL TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER
SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION A CITATION THAT SHALL INCLUDE:
(I) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE REGISTERED OWNER OF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE;
(II) THE REGISTRATION NUMBER OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
INVOLVED IN THE VIOLATION;
(III) THE VIOLATION CHARGED;
(IV) TO THE EXTENT POSSIBLE, THE LOCATION OF THE
VIOLATION;
(V) THE DATE AND TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(VI) A COPY OF THE RECORDED IMAGE;
(VII) THE AMOUNT OF THE CIVIL PENALTY IMPOSED AND THE
DATE BY WHICH THE CIVIL PENALTY MUST BE PAID;
(VIII) A SIGNED STATEMENT BY A TECHNICIAN EMPLOYED BY THE
AGENCY THAT, BASED ON THE INSPECTION OF THE RECORDED IMAGE, THE MOTOR
VEHICLE WAS BEING OPERATED DURING THE COMMISSION OF A VIOLATION;
(IX) A STATEMENT THAT THE RECORDED IMAGE IS EVIDENCE OF
A VIOLATION; AND
(X) INFORMATION ADVISING THE PERSON ALLEGED TO BE
LIABLE UNDER THIS SECTION:
1. OF THE MANNER AND TIME IN WHICH LIABILITY AS
ALLEGED IN THE CITATION MAY BE CONTESTED IN THE DISTRICT COURT; AND
– 10 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
2. THAT FAILURE TO PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY OR TO
CONTEST LIABILITY IN A TIMELY MANNER IS AN ADMISSION OF LIABILITY AND MAY
RESULT IN REFUSAL OR SUSPENSION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE REGISTRATION.
(2) THE AGENCY MAY MAIL A WARNING NOTICE IN PLACE OF A
CITATION TO THE OWNER LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION.
(3) (I) BEFORE MAILING A CITATION TO A MOTOR VEHICLE
RENTAL COMPANY LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION, AN AGENCY
SHALL MAIL A NOTICE TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY STATING THAT A
CITATION WILL BE MAILED TO THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY UNLESS,
WITHIN 45 DAYS AFTER RECEIVING THE NOTICE, THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL
COMPANY PROVIDES THE AGENCY WITH:
1. A STATEMENT MADE UNDER OATH THAT STATES THE
NAME AND LAST KNOWN MAILING ADDRESS OF THE INDIVIDUAL DRIVING OR
RENTING THE MOTOR VEHICLE WHEN THE VIOLATION OCCURRED;
2. A. A STATEMENT MADE UNDER OATH THAT
STATES THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY IS UNABLE TO DETERMINE
WHO WAS DRIVING THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME THE VIOLATION OCCURRED
BECAUSE THE MOTOR VEHICLE WAS STOLEN AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
B. A COPY OF THE POLICE REPORT ASSOCIATED WITH
THE MOTOR VEHICLE THEFT CLAIMED UNDER ITEM A OF THIS ITEM; OR
3. PAYMENT FOR THE PENALTY ASSOCIATED WITH THE
VIOLATION.
(II) AN AGENCY MAY NOT MAIL A CITATION TO A MOTOR
VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY LIABLE UNDER SUBSECTION (E) OF THIS SECTION IF
THE MOTOR VEHICLE RENTAL COMPANY COMPLIES WITH SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH.
(4) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION
AND SUBSECTION (H)(4) AND (5) OF THIS SECTION, A CITATION ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER THE ALLEGED
VIOLATION.
(5) A PERSON WHO RECEIVES A CITATION UNDER PARAGRAPH (1) OF
THIS SUBSECTION MAY:
(I) PAY THE CIVIL PENALTY IN ACCORDANCE WITH
INSTRUCTIONS ON THE CITATION; OR
– 11 –

Ch. 571 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(II) ELECT TO STAND TRIAL FOR THE ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(G) (1) A CERTIFICATE ALLEGING THAT A VIOLATION OCCURRED, SWORN
TO OR AFFIRMED BY A DULY AUTHORIZED LAW ENFORCEMENT OFFICER EMPLOYED
BY OR UNDER CONTRACT WITH AN AGENCY, BASED ON THE INSPECTION OF A
RECORDED IMAGE, SHALL BE EVIDENCE OF THE FACTS CONTAINED IN THE
CERTIFICATE AND SHALL BE ADMISSIBLE IN ANY PROCEEDING CONCERNING THE
ALLEGED VIOLATION.
(2) ADJUDICATION OF LIABILITY SHALL BE BASED ON
PREPONDERANCE OF THE EVIDENCE.
(H) (1) THE DISTRICT COURT MAY CONSIDER IN DEFENSE OF A
VIOLATION:
(I) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THAT
THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE WERE
STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL
OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION;
(II) SUBJECT TO PARAGRAPH (3) OF THIS SUBSECTION,
EVIDENCE THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE
MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
(III) ANY OTHER ISSUES AND EVIDENCE THAT THE DISTRICT
COURT CONSIDERS PERTINENT.
(2) TO DEMONSTRATE THAT THE MOTOR VEHICLE OR THE
REGISTRATION PLATES WERE STOLEN BEFORE THE VIOLATION OCCURRED AND
WERE NOT UNDER THE CONTROL OR POSSESSION OF THE OWNER AT THE TIME OF
THE VIOLATION, THE OWNER MUST SUBMIT PROOF THAT A POLICE REPORT ABOUT
THE STOLEN MOTOR VEHICLE OR REGISTRATION PLATES WAS FILED IN A TIMELY
MANNER.
(3) TO SATISFY THE EVIDENTIARY BURDEN UNDER PARAGRAPH
(1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION SHALL PROVIDE
TO THE DISTRICT COURT EVIDENCE TO THE SATISFACTION OF THE DISTRICT
COURT OF WHO WAS OPERATING THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION, INCLUDING, AT A MINIMUM, THE OPERATOR’S NAME AND CURRENT
ADDRESS.
– 12 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
(4) (I) THE PROVISIONS OF THIS PARAGRAPH APPLY ONLY TO A
CITATION THAT INVOLVES A CLASS E (TRUCK) VEHICLE WITH A REGISTERED GROSS
WEIGHT OF 26,001 POUNDS OR MORE, CLASS F (TRACTOR) VEHICLE, CLASS G
(TRAILER) VEHICLE OPERATED IN COMBINATION WITH A CLASS F (TRACTOR)
VEHICLE, OR CLASS P (PASSENGER BUS) VEHICLE.
(II) TO SATISFY THE EVIDENTIARY BURDEN UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1)(II) OF THIS SUBSECTION, THE PERSON NAMED IN A CITATION
DESCRIBED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH MAY PROVIDE TO THE
DISTRICT COURT A LETTER, SWORN TO OR AFFIRMED BY THE PERSON AND MAILED
BY CERTIFIED MAIL, RETURN RECEIPT REQUESTED, THAT:
1. STATES THAT THE PERSON NAMED IN THE CITATION
WAS NOT OPERATING THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION; AND
2. PROVIDES THE NAME, ADDRESS, AND DRIVER’S
LICENSE IDENTIFICATION NUMBER OF THE PERSON WHO WAS OPERATING THE
MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(5) (I) IF THE DISTRICT COURT FINDS THAT THE PERSON NAMED
IN THE CITATION WAS NOT OPERATING THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE
VIOLATION OR RECEIVES EVIDENCE UNDER PARAGRAPH (4)(II)2 OF THIS
SUBSECTION IDENTIFYING THE PERSON DRIVING THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME
OF THE VIOLATION, THE CLERK OF COURT SHALL PROVIDE TO THE AGENCY ISSUING
THE CITATION A COPY OF ANY EVIDENCE SUBSTANTIATING WHO WAS OPERATING
THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(II) ON RECEIPT OF SUBSTANTIATING EVIDENCE FROM THE
DISTRICT COURT UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE AGENCY
MAY ISSUE A CITATION AS PROVIDED IN SUBSECTION (F) OF THIS SECTION TO THE
PERSON WHO THE EVIDENCE INDICATES WAS OPERATING THE MOTOR VEHICLE AT
THE TIME OF THE VIOLATION.
(III) A CITATION ISSUED UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH SHALL BE MAILED NOT LATER THAN 2 WEEKS AFTER RECEIPT OF THE
EVIDENCE FROM THE DISTRICT COURT.
(I) IF THE CIVIL PENALTY IS NOT PAID AND THE VIOLATION IS NOT
CONTESTED, THE ADMINISTRATION MAY REFUSE TO REGISTER OR REREGISTER OR
MAY SUSPEND THE REGISTRATION OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE.
(J) A VIOLATION FOR WHICH A CIVIL PENALTY IS IMPOSED UNDER THIS
SECTION:
– 13 –

Ch. 571 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) IS NOT A MOVING VIOLATION FOR THE PURPOSE OF ASSESSING
POINTS UNDER § 16–402 OF THIS ARTICLE AND MAY NOT BE RECORDED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION ON THE DRIVING RECORD OF THE OWNER OR DRIVER OF THE
MOTOR VEHICLE; AND
(2) MAY NOT BE CONSIDERED IN THE PROVISION OF MOTOR VEHICLE
INSURANCE COVERAGE.
(K) IN CONSULTATION WITH LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCIES, THE CHIEF
JUDGE OF THE DISTRICT COURT SHALL ADOPT PROCEDURES FOR THE ISSUANCE
OF CITATIONS, TRIALS FOR VIOLATIONS, AND THE COLLECTION OF CIVIL PENALTIES
IMPOSED UNDER THIS SECTION.
(L) (1) AN AGENCY OR AN AGENT OR A CONTRACTOR DESIGNATED BY THE
AGENCY SHALL ADMINISTER AND PROCESS CIVIL CITATIONS ISSUED UNDER THIS
SECTION IN COORDINATION WITH THE DISTRICT COURT.
(2) IF A CONTRACTOR IN ANY MANNER OPERATES A STOP SIGN
MONITORING SYSTEM OR ADMINISTERS OR PROCESSES CITATIONS GENERATED BY
A STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM ON BEHALF OF BALTIMORE CITY, THE
CONTRACTOR’S FEE MAY NOT BE CONTINGENT ON A PER–TICKET BASIS ON THE
NUMBER OF CITATIONS ISSUED OR PAID.
21–707.1.
(a) This section applies only in Prince George’s County, THE 45TH AND 46TH
LEGISLATIVE DISTRICTS IN BALTIMORE CITY, AND THE CITY OF TAKOMA PARK.
(b) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) “Agency” means a law enforcement agency that is authorized to issue a
citation for a violation of the Maryland Vehicle Law or of local traffic laws or regulations.
(3) (i) “Owner” means the registered owner of a motor vehicle or lessee of
a motor vehicle under a lease of 6 months or more.
(ii) “Owner” does not include:
1. A motor vehicle leasing company; or
2. A holder of a special registration plate issued under Title
13, Subtitle 9, Part III of this article.
– 14 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
(4) “Recorded image” means images recorded by a stop sign monitoring
system:
(i) On:
1. Two or more photographs;
2. Two or more microphotographs;
3. Two or more electronic images;
4. Videotape; or
5. Any other medium; and
(ii) Showing a motor vehicle and, on at least one image or portion of
tape, clearly identifying the registration plate number of the motor vehicle.
(5) “Stop sign monitoring system” means a device designed to capture a
recorded image of a violation.
(6) (i) “Violation” means a failure to come to a complete stop at a stop
sign in violation of § 21–707 of this subtitle.
(ii) “Violation” does not include any action a driver is instructed to
take by a police officer.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraphs (2) through (5) of this subsection, an agency may
use stop sign monitoring systems:
(i) On highways located in a school zone maintained by a local
jurisdiction, if authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction; or
(ii) On State highways located in a school zone, if authorized by the
State Highway Administration.
(2) A stop sign monitoring system:
(i) May not be used in a local jurisdiction under this section unless
its use is authorized by the governing body of the local jurisdiction by local law enacted after
reasonable notice and a public hearing; and
(ii) [May] IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, MAY only be used at a
location approved by the Prince George’s County Council.
– 15 –

Ch. 571 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(3) [The county] PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY shall prioritize the
placement of stop sign monitoring systems within municipalities that have high violation
rates.
(4) Before beginning use of stop sign monitoring systems, an agency shall
publish notice that the agency has adopted the use of stop sign monitoring systems on its
website and, IN BALTIMORE CITY AND PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY ONLY, in a
newspaper of general circulation in the jurisdiction in which the stop sign monitoring system
will be used.
(5) (i) [The county] A LOCAL JURISDICTION THAT IMPLEMENTS A
STOP SIGN MONITORING SYSTEM shall prominently place signs on highways within the
[county] LOCAL JURISDICTION providing notice that stop sign monitoring systems are
used in the [county] LOCAL JURISDICTION.
(ii) The State Highway Administration shall place signs prominently
providing notice that stop sign monitoring systems are in use on State highways.
(d) A recorded image under this section indicating that the driver of a motor
vehicle has committed a violation shall include:
(1) The time and date of the violation; and
(2) To the extent possible, the location of the violation.
(e) (1) Unless the driver of the motor vehicle received a citation from a police
officer at the time of the violation, the owner or, in accordance with subsection (f)(3) or (h)(4)
or (5) of this section, the driver of a motor vehicle is subject to a civil penalty if the motor
vehicle is recorded by a stop sign monitoring system during the commission of a violation.
(2) A civil penalty under this subsection may not exceed $40.
(3) For purposes of this section, the District Court shall prescribe:
(i) A uniform citation form consistent with subsection (f)(1) of this
section and § 7–302 of the Courts Article; and
(ii) A civil penalty, which shall be indicated on the citation, to be paid
by persons who choose to prepay the civil penalty without appearing in District Court.
(f) (1) Subject to the provisions of paragraphs (2) through (5) of this subsection,
an agency shall mail to the owner liable under subsection (e) of this section a citation that
shall include:
(i) The name and address of the registered owner of the vehicle;
– 16 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
(ii) The registration PLATE number of the motor vehicle involved in
the violation;
(iii) The violation charged;
(iv) To the extent possible, the location of the violation;
(v) The date and time of the violation;
(vi) A copy of the recorded image;
(vii) The amount of the civil penalty imposed and the date by which
the civil penalty must be paid;
(viii) A signed statement by a technician employed by the agency that,
based on the inspection of the recorded image, the motor vehicle was being operated during
the commission of a violation;
(ix) A statement that the recorded image is evidence of a violation; and
(x) Information advising the person alleged to be liable under this
section:
1. Of the manner and time in which liability as alleged in the
citation may be contested in the District Court; and
2. That failure to pay the civil penalty or to contest liability
in a timely manner is an admission of liability and may result in refusal or suspension of
the motor vehicle registration.
(2) The agency may mail a warning notice in place of a citation to the owner
liable under subsection (e) of this section.
(3) (i) Before mailing a citation to a motor vehicle rental company liable
under subsection (e) of this section, an agency shall mail a notice to the motor vehicle rental
company stating that a citation will be mailed to the motor vehicle rental company unless,
within 45 days after receiving the notice, the motor vehicle rental company provides the
agency with:
1. A statement made under oath that states the name and last
known mailing address of the individual driving or renting the motor vehicle when the
violation occurred;
2. A. A statement made under oath that states that the
motor vehicle rental company is unable to determine who was driving the vehicle at the time
the violation occurred because the motor vehicle was stolen at the time of the violation; and
– 17 –

Ch. 571 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
B. A copy of the police report associated with the motor vehicle
theft claimed under item A of this item; or
3. Payment for the penalty associated with the violation.
(ii) An agency may not mail a citation to a motor vehicle rental
company liable under subsection (e) of this section if the motor vehicle rental company
complies with subparagraph (i) of this paragraph.
(4) Except as provided in paragraph (3) of this subsection and subsection
(h)(4) and (5) of this section, a citation issued under this section shall be mailed not later
than 2 weeks after the alleged violation.
(5) A person who receives a citation under paragraph (1) of this subsection
may:
(i) Pay the civil penalty in accordance with instructions on the
citation; or
(ii) Elect to stand trial for the alleged violation.
(g) (1) A certificate alleging that a violation occurred, sworn to or affirmed by
a duly authorized law enforcement officer employed by or under contract with an agency,
based on the inspection of a recorded image, shall be evidence of the facts contained in the
certificate and shall be admissible in any proceeding concerning the alleged violation.
(2) Adjudication of liability shall be based on preponderance of the evidence.
(h) (1) The District Court may consider in defense of a violation:
(i) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, that the motor vehicle
or registration plates of the motor vehicle were stolen before the violation occurred and were
not under the control or possession of the owner at the time of the violation;
(ii) Subject to paragraph (3) of this subsection, evidence that the
person named in the citation was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation; and
(iii) Any other issues and evidence that the District Court considers
pertinent.
(2) To demonstrate that the motor vehicle or the registration plates were
stolen before the violation occurred and were not under the control or possession of the owner
at the time of the violation, the owner must submit proof that a police report about the stolen
motor vehicle or registration plates was filed in a timely manner.
– 18 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
(3) To satisfy the evidentiary burden under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, the person named in the citation shall provide to the District Court evidence to
the satisfaction of the District Court of who was operating the vehicle at the time of the
violation, including, at a minimum, the operator’s name and current address.
(4) (i) The provisions of this paragraph apply only to a citation that
involves a Class E (truck) vehicle with a registered gross weight of 26,001 pounds or more,
Class F (tractor) vehicle, Class G (trailer) vehicle operated in combination with a Class F
(tractor) vehicle, or Class P (passenger bus) vehicle.
(ii) To satisfy the evidentiary burden under paragraph (1)(ii) of this
subsection, the person named in a citation described under subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph may provide to the District Court a letter, sworn to or affirmed by the person and
mailed by certified mail, return receipt requested, that:
1. States that the person named in the citation was not
operating the vehicle at the time of the violation; and
2. Provides the name, address, and driver’s license
identification number of the person who was operating the vehicle at the time of the violation.
(5) (i) If the District Court finds that the person named in the citation
was not operating the vehicle at the time of the violation or receives evidence under
paragraph (4)(ii)2 of this subsection identifying the person driving the vehicle at the time of
the violation, the clerk of court shall provide to the agency issuing the citation a copy of any
evidence substantiating who was operating the vehicle at the time of the violation.
(ii) On receipt of substantiating evidence from the District Court
under subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, the agency may issue a citation as provided in
subsection (f) of this section to the person who the evidence indicates was operating the
vehicle at the time of the violation.
(iii) A citation issued under subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph shall
be mailed not later than 2 weeks after receipt of the evidence from the District Court.
(i) If the civil penalty is not paid and the violation is not contested, the
Administration may refuse to register or reregister or may suspend the registration of the
motor vehicle.
(j) A violation for which a civil penalty is imposed under this section:
(1) Is not a moving violation for the purpose of assessing points under §
16–402 of this article and may not be recorded by the Administration on the driving record
of the owner or driver of the vehicle; and
– 19 –

Ch. 571 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(2) May not be considered in the provision of motor vehicle insurance
coverage.
(k) In consultation with law enforcement agencies, the Chief Judge of the District
Court shall adopt procedures for the issuance of citations, trials for violations, and the
collection of civil penalties imposed under this section.
(l) (1) An agency or an agent or a contractor designated by the agency shall
administer and process civil citations issued under this section in coordination with the
District Court.
(2) If a contractor in any manner operates a stop sign monitoring system or
administers or processes citations generated by a STOP SIGN monitoring system on behalf
of a local jurisdiction, the contractor’s fee may not be contingent on a per–ticket basis on the
number of citations issued or paid.
SECTION 4. 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, on or before December 1,
2026 2027, the Baltimore City Department of Transportation shall and the City of Takoma
Park, respectively, shall each report to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of
the State Government Article, the General Assembly on:
(1) through October 1, 2026 2027:
(i) the time period during which stop sign monitoring systems were
in use in the City local jurisdiction; and
(ii) the number of warnings and citations issued as a result of
violations recorded by a stop sign monitoring system in the City local jurisdiction over the
reported time period, by location and date;
(2) (i) the costs associated with implementing and operating stop sign
monitoring systems; and
(ii) the revenue collected on a monthly basis as a result of violations
recorded by stop sign monitoring systems;
(3) appropriate locations for the deployment of stop sign monitoring
systems;
(4) the performance and reliability of stop sign monitoring systems used by
the City local jurisdiction; and
(5) the effectiveness of stop sign monitoring systems in reducing violations,
crashes, and pedestrian injuries in the City local jurisdiction and in areas where the stop
sign monitoring systems were implemented and used.
– 20 –

WES MOORE, Governor Ch. 571
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act shall take
effect on the taking effect of the termination provision specified in Section 3 of Chapter 678
of the Acts of the General Assembly of 2024. If that termination provision takes effect,
Section 1 of this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly, shall be
abrogated and of no further force and effect. This Act may not be interpreted to have any
effect on that termination provision.
SECTION 6. 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to the provisions
of Section 5 of this Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2025. It shall remain effective for
a period of 5 4 years and, at the end of June 30, 2030 2029, this Act, with no further action
required by the General Assembly, shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.
Approved by the Governor, May 13, 2025.
– 21 –